New Jersey, session 221, S2611.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  The president of each public institution of higher education shall convene a menstrual equity task force. The purpose of the task force shall be to further advance the institutions efforts towards achieving menstrual equity.   The task force shall review the current efforts, needs, and access to menstrual products on campus and identify best practices towards achieving menstrual equity. b.  Members of the task force shall be appointed by the president of the institution and shall include a cross-section of campus stakeholders including, as applicable, representatives of: the student body; faculty and staff; administration; student housing; athletics; student health centers; on-campus food pantries or similar resources; and facilities management. c.  No later than six months after the effective date of this act, the task force shall submit to the president a comprehensive and sustainable plan towards achieving menstrual equity on campus that is best suited to the needs of the institution.  The plan shall include, but shall not be limited to: (1) an estimate of the number of students and other individuals in need of free products; (2) suitable locations for free product distribution; (3) any other proposals that the task force believes would advance the goal of menstrual equity on campus; (4) the projected cost of the plan; and (5) a timeline for implementation of the plan that ensures full implementation by the institution within 12 months of the effective date of this act. The president shall forward the plan to the governing body of the institution, which shall then forward the plan to the Governor, and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1). d.  The president of the institution shall implement the plan within 12 months of the effective date of this act. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the institution from taking action towards menstrual equity in advance of the timeline established pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection c. of this section. e.  As used in this act, menstrual equity means equal and comprehensive access to menstrual hygiene products, which both remove barriers to care and reduces stigma surrounding menstruation. f.  Each task force shall expire 30 days after the submission of its plan to its governing body. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.